New Jersey, session 221, A4062.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Following an oral agreement to provide coverage pursuant to a health benefits plan, a carrier shall: (1)   include language in the health benefits plan contract that gives the covered person the right to, upon request, receive any recording of the oral agreement made by the carrier, as well as a written transcript of the oral agreement; and (2)   send a written copy of the agreement to the covered person no later than 30 days after the oral agreements formation.  The written copy shall comply with the Life and Health Insurance Policy Simplification Act, P.L.1979, c.167 (C.17B:17-17 et seq.). b.    Failure to comply with this act shall be a practice prohibited by N.J.S.17B:30-2. c.     Upon receipt of a written copy of an oral agreement pursuant to subsection a. of this section, a covered person shall have 30 days to notify the insurer of any difference between the written contract and the oral agreement. d.    As used in this section: Carrier means an insurance company, health service corporation, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation or health maintenance organization authorized to issue health benefits plans in this State and a dental service corporation or dental plan organization authorized to issue dental plans in this State. Health benefits plan means a benefits plan which pays or provides hospital and medical expense benefits for covered services, and is delivered or issued for delivery in this State by or through a carrier.  Health benefits plan includes, but is not limited to, Medicare supplement coverage and risk contracts to the extent not otherwise prohibited by federal law. Oral agreement means an agreement between a carrier and a covered person that was entered verbally for purposes including, but not limited to, providing coverage pursuant to a health benefits plan, expanding, decreasing, or revising coverage, and reimbursement of claims. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment.